District of Columbia statutes.
5-1306

Protection of emergency 2-way radio communications — Definition.

For the purpose of §§ 5-1306 to 5-1309, “emergency” means a condition or circumstance in which an individual is or is reasonably believed by the person transmitting a communication referred to in § 5-1307 to be in imminent danger of death or serious bodily harm or in which property is in imminent danger of damage or destruction.

History

Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-105, § 2, 33 DCR 1162

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-1308 and § 5-1309.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-1106.